Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5703
Applicability of act.

The Producer-Controlled Property and Casualty Insurer Act shall apply to insurers either domiciled in this state or domiciled in a state that is not an accredited state. All provisions of the Insurance Holding Company System Act, to the extent they are not superseded by the Producer-Controlled Property and Casualty Insurer Act, shall continue to apply to all parties within holding company systems subject to the Producer-Controlled Property and Casualty Insurer Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 70.

Insurance Holding Company System Act, see section 44-2120.